hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Terenska vozila: ATV i UTV; Go kart i dune buggy vozila; Vozila Monster Truck
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Vehicule > Autovehicule > Vehicule off-road și de teren: ATV-uri și UTV-uri; Mașini karting și mașini pentru plajă; Monster Trucks
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járművek > Gépjárművek > Off-road és terepjáró járművek: ATV-k és UTV-k; Gokartok és homokfutók; Monster truckok
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıtlar > Motorlu Taşıtlar > Yol Dışı ve Arazi Tipi Araçlar: ATV'ler ve UTV'ler; Gokartlar ve Kumsal Arabaları; Canavar Kamyonlar
it: Veicoli e parti > Veicoli > Veicoli per terraferma > Veicoli fuoristrada: ATV e UTV; Go-kart e dune buggy; Camion monster
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Kjøretøy > Biler > Offroad- og terrengkjøretøy: ATV-er og UTV-er; Gokarts og dune buggies; Monstertrucker
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigen > Landvoertuigen > Terreinwagens en quads: ATV's en UTV's; Gocarts en duinbuggy's; Monstertrucks
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvot > Moottoriajoneuvot > Maastoautot ja mönkijät: Mönkijät ja koppitraktorit; Karting-autot ja rantakirput; Monsteriautot
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具 > 机动车 > 越野车与全地形车: 全地形车; 卡丁车/沙滩车; 怪物卡车
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Dopravní prostředky > Motorová vozidla > Terénní a offroad vozidla: Čtyřkolky ATV a UTV; Motokáry a buginy; Monster trucky
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicles > Motor Vehicles > Off-Road and All-Terrain Vehicles: ATVs & UTVs; Go Karts & Dune Buggies; Monster Trucks
da: Køretøjer og dele > Køretøjer > Motorkøretøjer > Terrænkøretøjer: ATV'er og UTV'er; Gocarts og strandbuggier; Monstertrucks
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Vozidlá > Motorové vozidlá > Terénne vozidlá a štvorkolky: ATV a UTV; Motokáry a terénne motokáry; Monster Trucks
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Xe cộ > Xe cơ giới > Xe đi trên địa hình hiểm trở và xe đi trên mọi loại địa hình: ATV và UTV; Xe trần bốn bánh go kart và xe địa hình trên cát; Xe tải quái vật
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Транспортные средства > Автотранспорт > Транспортные средства повышенной проходимости: Мотовездеходы и квадроциклы; Карты и багги; Монстр-траки
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos terrestres > Veículos off-road e all-terrain: Quadriciclos; Karts e bugues; Caminhões monstro
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Οχήματα > Μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα > Οχήματα εκτός δρόμου και παντός εδάφους: ATV & UTV; Καροτσάκια go-kart & dune buggies (οχήματα εκτός δρόμου); Monster Trucks
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Vozila > Motorna vozila > Terenska vozila in štirikolesniki: Štirikolesniki in terenska vozila; Gokarti in buggyji; Predelana terenska vozila
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Veículos > Veículos motorizados > Veículos todo-o-terreno: ATV e UTV; Karts e buggies; Monster trucks
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonės > Motorinės transporto priemonės > Visureigiai ir keturračiai: Keturračiai; Gokartai ir bagiai; Monstras visureigis
pl: Pojazdy i części > Pojazdy > Pojazdy silnikowe > Pojazdy terenowe i quady: Quady i pojazdy wielozadaniowe; Gokarty i pojazdy typu buggy; Monster Trucks
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛 > 機動車輛 > 越野車/全地形車: 全地形車/多功能越野車; 卡丁沙灘車; 怪獸卡車
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ยานพาหนะ > ยานยนต์ > รถยนต์ออฟโรดและรถยนต์สำหรับทุกสภาพถนน: ATV และ UTV; รถโกคาร์ทและบั๊กกี้; รถบรรทุกมอนสเตอร์
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Véhicules > Véhicules terrestres > Véhicules tout-terrain et quads: Véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Karts et buggys; Monster Trucks
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeuge > Kraftfahrzeuge > Gelände- & Allradfahrzeuge: Quads; Go-Karts; Monstertrucks
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Превозни средства > Моторни превозни средства > Офроуд и ATV превозни средства: ATV и UTV; Картинги и бъгита; Чудовищни камиони
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 > 자동차 > 오프로드/사륜구동 차량: ATV/UTV; 경주용 자동차/모래언덕용 소형차; 몬스터 트럭
es: Vehículos y recambios > Vehículos > Vehículos motorizados > Vehículos TT y UTV: ATV y UTV; Karts y buggies de playa; Camiones monstruo
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物 > 自動車・バイク > オフロード車・全地形車: ATV・UTV; ゴーカート・バギーカー; モンスタートラック
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordon > Motorfordon > Offroad- och terrängfordon: ATV- och UTV-fordon; Go-karts & sandloppor; Monstertruckar